Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1214
Sections, how construed.

No part of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 shall be construed to apply to horseracing or horserace meetings at any state or county fair or elsewhere unless the parimutuel system of wagering hereinbefore described is used or intended to be used in connection therewith; but no person, association or corporation shall hold, conduct or operate any such race or meeting in connection with which said parimutuel system is used or intended to be used without a license as hereinbefore provided.

Laws 1935, c. 173, § 14, p. 635;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1514;

R.S.1943, § 2-1214.